Maryland, session 2025, HB0198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
SUBTITLE 12. CRIME SOLVERS REWARD FUND.
11–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COUNTY REWARD PROGRAM” MEANS A PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY A
COUNTY THAT OFFERS REWARD MONEY TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES
QUALIFYING INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE INVESTIGATION OF A MURDER OR AN
ATTEMPTED MURDER INVOLVING A FIREARM.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE CRIME SOLVERS REWARD FUND.
(D) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–201
OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(E) “QUALIFYING INFORMATION” MEANS INFORMATION PROVIDED TO A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT DIRECTLY LEADS TO THE IDENTIFICATION,
ARREST, AND CONVICTION OF THE PERPETRATOR OF A CRIME.
11–1202.
(A) THERE IS A CRIME SOLVERS REWARD FUND IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES OR COUNTY REWARD PROGRAMS TO ISSUE REWARDS TO
INDIVIDUALS WHO PROVIDE QUALIFYING INFORMATION TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY RELEVANT TO THE INVESTIGATION OF A MURDER OR AN ATTEMPTED
MURDER INVOLVING A FIREARM.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 198 3
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) MONEY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE FUND THROUGH FEDERAL
PROGRAMS OR PRIVATE CONTRIBUTIONS;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(G) (1) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO AWARD GRANTS TO A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR A COUNTY REWARD PROGRAM IN ORDER FOR THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR THE COUNTY REWARD PROGRAM TO PROVIDE REWARD
MONEY TO INDIVIDUALS WHO PROVIDE A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH
QUALIFYING INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE INVESTIGATION OF A MURDER OR AN
ATTEMPTED MURDER INVOLVING A FIREARM.
(2) FOR AN INDIVIDUAL TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A REWARD FROM A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR A COUNTY REWARD PROGRAM UNDER THIS SUBTITLE,
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR COUNTY REWARD PROGRAM SHALL ESTABLISH
THAT THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) PROVIDED CREDIBLE QUALIFYING INFORMATION;
(II) DID NOT DIRECTLY PARTICIPATE IN THE CRIME; AND
(III) COOPERATED WITH THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(H) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:

HOUSE BILL 198
(1) THE NUMBER OF REWARDS ISSUED BY LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES AND COUNTY REWARD PROGRAMS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(2) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
11–1203.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE REGULATIONS SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) CRITERIA EXPLAINING HOW ELIGIBLE LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES AND COUNTY REWARD PROGRAMS MAY APPLY FOR FUNDING FROM THE
FUND; AND
(2) CRITERIA FOR THE DISTRIBUTION OF AVAILABLE FUNDS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE CRIME SOLVERS REWARD FUND.

HOUSE BILL 198 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.